sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazdectvo > Starostlivosť o kone > Starostlivosť o kone > Hrebene, kefy a rukavice pre kone > Pomôcky na starostlivosť o kone: Bloky a kamene na starostlivosť o kone; Hrebene na česanie hrivy a chvosta; Nožnice na strihanie koní; Škrabky na kopytá; Škrabky na konský pot
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Jojimo sportas > Žirgų priežiūra > Žirgų priežiūra > Šukos, šepečiai ir pirštinės žirgams > Žirgų priežiūros priemonės: Arklio priežiūros blokai ir akmenys; Arklio karčių ir uodegos šukos; Arklio priežiūros žirklės ir karpymo žirklės; Arklio kanopų krapštukai; Arklio prakaito nubraukikliai
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Binicilik > At Bakım Ürünleri > At Tımarlama > At Tımar Tarakları, Fırçaları ve Eldivenleri > At Tımarı: At tımar blokları ve taşları; At yele ve kuyruk tırmıkları; At tımar makasları; At toynağı temizleyicileri; At ter sıyırıcıları
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 승마 > 말 관리 > 말털 손질용품 > 말 그루밍 빗/브러시/미트 > 말 그루밍 그루머: 말 털 손질용 블록 및 스톤; 말 갈기 및 꼬리 레이크; 말 털 손질용 가위; 말 후프 픽; 말 땀 긁개
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Echitație > Îngrijirea cailor > Întreținerea cailor > Piepteni, perii și mănuși pentru întreținerea cailor > Dispozitive pentru întreținerea cailor: Blocuri și pietre de toaletare pentru cai; Greble de toaletare pentru coama și coada calului; Foarfece pentru îngrijirea cailor; Scobitori pentru curățat copite; Raclete pentru transpirație la cai
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jahanje > Nega konj > Urejanje konj > Glavniki, krtače in rokavice za nego konj > Pripomočki za nego konjske dlake: Bloki in kamni za nego konj; Glavniki za razvozlavanje za konjsko grivo in rep; Škarje za nego konj; Klini za čiščenje kopit; Strgala za konjski znoj
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ratsastus > Hevostenhoito > Hevosen hoitaminen > Hevosen kammat, harjat ja suat > Hevosen hoitosuat: Hevosen puhdistuskivet; Hevosen harja- ja häntäveitset; Hevosen trimmaussakset; Kaviokoukut; Hikiviilat
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Paardensport > Verzorging van paarden > Paardenverzorging > Kammen, borstels en handschoenen voor paardenverzorging > Trimmers voor paardenverzorging: Poetsblokken en -stenen voor paarden; Maan- en staartharken voor paarden; Groomingscharen voor paarden; Hoevenkrabbers; Zweetmessen voor paarden
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ιππασία > Φροντίδα αλόγων > Καλλωπισμός αλόγων > Χτένες, βούρτσες & γάντια καλλωπισμού για άλογα > Εργαλεία καλλωπισμού για άλογα: Μπλοκ & ελαφρόπετρες περιποίησης αλόγου; Τσουγκράνες χαίτης & ουράς αλόγου; Ψαλίδια περιποίησης αλόγου; Καθαριστήρια οπλών αλόγου; Ξύστρες ιδρώτα αλόγου
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 乗馬 > 馬用品 > 馬用グルーミング用品 > 馬用グルーミングコーム・ブラシ > 馬のグルーミンググルーマー: 馬用軽石・グルーミングストーン; 馬用グルーミングたてがみ・尻尾レーキ; 馬用グルーミングハサミ・シアー; 馬用フーフピック; 馬用汗こき
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Dressur > Produkter til hestepleje > Hestepleje > Kamme, børster og handsker til strigling > Hesteplejegroomere: Striglesten til heste; Man- og haletrimmere til heste; Sakse til pelspleje af heste; Hovrensere til heste; Svedskrabere til heste
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Jahanje > Njega konja > Timarenje konja > Češljevi, četke i rukavice za timarenje konja > Alati za timarenje konja: Blokovi i kamenje za timarenje konja; Grablje za timarenje grive i repa konja; Škare i makaze za timarenje konja; Kuke za kopita konja; Strugalice za znoj za konje
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การขี่ม้า > การดูแลม้า > อุปกรณ์เสริมสวยสำหรับม้า > หวี แปรง และถุงมือดูแลม้า > อุปกรณ์ดูแลม้า: หินและบล็อกขัดขนม้า; คราดสางแผงคอและหางม้า; กรรไกรตัดแต่งขนม้า; เหล็กแคะกีบม้า; ที่รีดเหงื่อม้า
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hestesport > Hestepleie > Hesterøkting > Kammer, børster og vanter for hestepleie > Pleiesteiner for hesterøkting: Pusseblokker og pussesteiner for hest; Man- og haleraker for hest; Pussesakser for hest; Hovkrafser for hest; Svetteskraper for hest
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Equestrian > Horse Care > Horse Grooming > Horse Grooming Combs, Brushes & Mitts > Horse Grooming Groomers: Horse Grooming Blocks & Stones; Horse Grooming Mane & Tail Rakes; Horse Grooming Scissors & Shears; Horse Hoof Picks; Horse Sweat Scrapers
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 马术用品 > 马匹护理用品 > 马毛梳洗 > 马毛梳洗梳子、刷子与手套 > 马毛梳洗美容仪: 马用美容块和磨石; 马鬃和马尾美容耙; 马用美容剪; 马蹄钩; 马用刮汗板
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jeździectwo > Produkty do pielęgnacji koni > Artykuły do pielęgnacji koni > Rękawice, szczotki i grzebienie do czyszczenia koni > Pielęgnacja koni: Bloki i kamienie czyszczące dla koni; Trymery do grzywy i ogona konia; Nożyczki i sekatory do pielęgnacji koni; Kopystki; Ściągaczki do potu dla koni
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cưỡi ngựa > Chăm sóc ngựa > Chải lông ngựa > Lược, bàn chải cho ngựa và găng tay hở ngón > Dụng cụ cắt tỉa lông ngựa: Khối & đá chải lông ngựa; Cào chải bờm & đuôi ngựa; Kéo cắt & tỉa lông ngựa; Móc làm sạch móng ngựa; Dao gạt mồ hôi ngựa
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 馬術運動 > 馬匹照護用品 > 馬梳 > 馬匹清潔梳子/毛刷/手套 > 馬匹清潔美容用品: 馬匹清潔磚塊與浮石; 馬匹鬃毛與尾毛耙刷; 馬匹修剪剪刀; 蹄鉤; 馬匹刮汗板
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Hästsport > Hästutrustning > Hästryktning > Ryktborstar och mankammar för hästar > Hästryktningsgroomers: Ryktstenar för hästar; Man- och svanskratsar för hästar; Trimsaxar för hästar; Hovkratsar; Svettskrapor för hästar
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Конен спорт > Грижа за коне > Подстригване на коне > Гребени, четки и ръкавици за коне > Консумативи за подстригване на коне: Абразивни блокове и камъни за конска грижа; Гребла за грива и опашка за коне; Ножици за подстригване и оформяне на коне; Шила за конски копита; Инструменти за премахване на конска пот
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Reitsportzubehör > Pferdebedarf > Pferdehaarpflege > Kämme, Bürsten & Striegel > Pferdepflegebürsten: Putzblöcke & Bimssteine für Pferde; Mähnen- & Schweifrechen für Pferde; Pferdescheren; Hufauskratzer; Schweißmesser für Pferde
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Конный спорт > Товары для ухода за лошадьми > Уход за лошадьми > Расчески, щетки и перчатки для вычесывания лошадей > Скребницы для лошадей: Груминг-блоки и камни для лошадей; Расчески-грабли для гривы и хвоста; Ножницы для стрижки лошадей; Крючки для копыт; Водосгоны для лошадей
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Equitación > Cuidado de caballos > Acicalamiento de caballos > Peines, cepillos y guantes para acicalar caballos > Peluquerías para caballos: Bloques y piedras de aseo para caballos; Rastrillos de aseo para crines y colas de caballos; Tijeras y esquiladoras de aseo para caballos; Limpiacascos para caballos; Escurridores de sudor para caballos
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Lovaglás > Lógondozás > Lóápolás > Lóápolási fésűk, kefék és kesztyűk > Lóápolási ápolók: Lóápoló blokkok és kövek; Sörény- és farokritkítók lónak; Lóápoló ollók és nyírók; Patakaparók lónak; Tajtékhúzók lónak
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Equestre > Cuidados com cavalos > Escovagem de cavalos > Luvas, escovas e pentes para escovagem de cavalos > Artigos para escovar cavalos: Blocos e pedras de limpeza para cavalo; Escovas de desembaraçar para crina e cauda; Tesouras de tosquia e limpeza para cavalo; Limpadores de cascos de cavalo; Rapas de suor para cavalo
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes equestres > Suprimentos para cavalos > Grooming de cavalos > Pentes, escovas e luvas para cuidados com cavalos > Tosadores para cuidados com cavalos: Pedras e blocos de limpeza para cavalo; Ancinhos de crina e cauda para cavalo; Tesouras de tosa para cavalo; Limpadores de casco para cavalo; Raspadores de suor para cavalo
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Équitation > Articles pour chevaux > Articles de toilettage pour chevaux > Peignes, brosses et gants de toilettage > Soins de toilettage pour chevaux: Pierres et blocs de pansage; Peignes râteaux pour crinière et queue; Ciseaux de pansage pour cheval; Cure-pieds; Couteaux de chaleur
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Jezdectví > Potřeby pro koně > Péče o koně > Hříbla, kartáče a rukavice pro péči o koně > Péče o koně – hřebeny na srst: Čisticí bloky a kameny na koně; Kartáče a hrabla na hřívu a ocas; Nůžky na úpravu koní; Háčky na kopyta; Stěrky na pot pro koně
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Equitazione > Cura dei cavalli > Strigliatura cavalli > Pettini, spazzole e guanti per la strigliatura dei cavalli > Acconciatori per toelettatura cavalli: Pietre e blocchi per la toelettatura del cavallo; Pettini a rastrello per criniera e coda del cavallo; Forbici e cesoie per toelettatura dei cavalli; Nettapiedi per cavalli; Stecche asciugasudore per cavalli